Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 9 Judges and Other Court Employees; Certain County Employees

47-2-290.
Judges, solicitors, and other employees of state courts subject to merit system; membership in retirement system; contributions; exemptions.

The state courts of this state are declared to be adjuncts of the superior courts, the state courts having concurrent jurisdiction in all civil and criminal matters except those exclusively vested in the superior courts. All judges, solicitors, and other employees of any state court in this state shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration as promulgated by each state court under which all such officers and employees shall perform services on the basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. All such officers and employees are authorized to become members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia in accordance with this chapter. The governing authority of each county of this state shall deduct or collect from each member the employee contributions required by this chapter and shall remit those contributions to the retirement system on a monthly basis. The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia is authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated or otherwise available the employer contribution required by this chapter for judges and employees of the state courts, which contribution shall be paid by The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia, upon receipt of an invoice from the retirement system. The Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia is authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated or otherwise available the employer contribution required by this chapter for solicitors-general of the state courts, which contribution shall be paid by the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, upon receipt of an invoice from the retirement system.

All judges, solicitors, and other employees of any state court who were in service on December 1, 1952, shall be entitled to all benefits authorized under this chapter in the same manner as if they had been members of the retirement system on that date.

Reserved.

Code Section 47-2-291 shall not apply to judges and solicitors of the state courts who participate in the retirement system in their capacity as judges and solicitors; but all judges and solicitors so participating shall be entitled to credit for all their prior years of service rendered as judge or solicitor, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 305, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 7/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436; Ga. L. 2020, p. 474, § 4/SB 176.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (a), in the fifth sentence, substituted “Council of State Court Judges of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” twice, substituted “or otherwise available” for “for the operation of the superior courts of this state” in the middle, and inserted “for judges and employees of the state courts” near the end, and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council” for “the Council” in the fifth sentence of subsection (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, repealed and reserved former subsection (c), which read: “Subsection (b) of Code Section 47-2-110 shall not apply to the judges and solicitors of any state court, who may retire at their discretion at any time after becoming eligible to retire.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-2-291.
Prior service as a judge or solicitor of a court of record.

Prior service performed by a member as a judge or solicitor of a court of record shall be creditable year for year, not to exceed five years for each type of service, notwithstanding that such service may have been for longer periods.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 175, § 3.

47-2-292.
Merit system of personnel administration for county revenue employees; membership in retirement system; contributions; credit for prior service.

The offices of the tax commissioners, tax collectors, and tax receivers of the counties of this state are declared to be adjuncts of the Department of Revenue, such offices assisting in the returning and collecting of state taxes. All tax commissioners, tax collectors, and tax receivers and employees in their offices shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration, as promulgated by each such office, under which all such officials and employees shall perform services on the basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency.

(a.1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, no person who first or again takes office or becomes employed on or after July 1, 2012, shall become a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section. Any person serving in any such position on July 1, 2012, who continues in service without a break in service shall remain a member of this retirement system. The reelection of any such officer or the election of any eligible employee to such office shall not constitute a break in service.

The official in charge of such office, if he or she is responsible for the payment of the employees in that office, or the governing authority of the county, if the official and the employees are paid by it, shall deduct or collect from each member the employee contributions required by this chapter and shall remit the same to the retirement system as required by regulations. The state revenue commissioner is authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated for the operation of the Department of Revenue, the employer contributions required by this chapter, upon receipt of an invoice from the retirement system.

In addition to the regular employer contributions required by this chapter, the state revenue commissioner is authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated for the operation of the Department of Revenue an additional contribution, as determined by the board of trustees, in a regular monthly amount sufficient to amortize, within a period of not more than 20 years, the prior service values of such members.

Except for those persons holding office on June 30, 1983, and except as otherwise provided by subsection (f) of this Code section, any person who becomes a tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver at any time after June 30, 1983, shall be a member of the retirement system under the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334 as a condition of holding office. Any person holding office as a tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver on June 30, 1983, except such officials who are then members of the retirement system and except as otherwise provided by subsection (f) of this Code section, shall have the option of becoming a member of the retirement system, and such option must be exercised by not later than June 30, 1984. Such officials electing membership in the retirement system may obtain creditable service under the retirement system for actual previous service as tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver or as an employee of any such official by paying to the board of trustees the regular employer and employee contributions for each year or portion thereof claimed as previous service, with the computation of such contributions being based on the compensation of the official at the time of becoming a member of the retirement system. In addition to such employer and employee contributions, the official claiming such previous service shall pay interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum on the amount of such contributions compounded annually from the time the previous service was rendered until payment is made to the board of trustees. The payment required for such previous service shall be made to the board of trustees at the time application is made for membership in the retirement system. Except for the right to obtain creditable service for previous service as provided in this subsection, any official holding office on June 30, 1983, who elects membership in the retirement system shall be under the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

Except for those persons in employment on June 30, 1983, and except as otherwise provided by subsection (f) of this Code section, any person who becomes an employee of a tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver at any time after June 30, 1983, shall have the option, which must be exercised within 180 days after the date of employment, of becoming a member of the retirement system under the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334. Any person employed by a tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver on June 30, 1983, except such employees who are then members of the retirement system and except as otherwise provided by subsection (f) of this Code section, shall have the option of becoming a member of the retirement system, and such option must be exercised by not later than June 30, 1984. Such employees electing membership in the retirement system may obtain creditable service under the retirement system for actual previous service as an employee of a tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver by paying to the board of trustees the regular employer and employee contributions for each year or portion thereof claimed as previous service, with the computation of such contributions being based on the compensation of the employee at the time of becoming a member of the retirement system. In addition to such employer and employee contributions, the employee claiming such previous service shall pay interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum on the amount of such contributions compounded annually from the time the previous service was rendered until payment is made to the board of trustees. The payment required for such previous service shall be made to the board of trustees at the time application is made for membership in the retirement system. Except for the right to obtain creditable service for previous service as provided in this subsection, any person employed on June 30, 1983, who elects membership in the retirement system shall be under the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, no tax commissioner, tax collector, tax receiver, or any employee of any such official shall be eligible for membership in the retirement system if such official or employee is covered or becomes covered by any other public retirement or pension system, excluding social security coverage and coverage under any county or other local retirement or pension system. The provisions of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section shall apply to any tax officials or their employees who become members of the retirement system pursuant to subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 637, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 41, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1013, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 880, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 655, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 527, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 32/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1051, § 2/SB 286.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsection (b), which read: “All individuals who served as such officials and employees on or after December 1, 1956, are eligible to become members of Division A of the retirement system. Any individual who becomes such an official or employee after August 1, 1958, shall become a member of Division A of the retirement system as a condition of his employment.”; redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (b) and (c), respectively; inserted “or she” in the first sentence of present subsection (b); deleted former subsection (e), which read: “All tax commissioners, tax collectors, tax receivers, and the employees in their offices who were in service on or after December 1, 1956, shall be entitled to all prior service credits authorized under this chapter in the same manner as if they had been members of the retirement system on such date, provided that prior service credits shall be available only to persons who become members at the time coverage was originally extended to them. No prior service credit shall be available to a person who became such an official or employee after August 1, 1958. The value of the prior service credits under this Code section shall not be in excess of the value of 25 years of prior service.”; redesignated former subsections (f) through (h) as present subsections (d) through (f), respectively; substituted “subsection (f)” for “subsection (h)” twice in present subsections (d) and (e); and, in the last sentence of present subsection (f), substituted “subsections (a), (b), and (c)” for “subsections (a), (c), and (d)” and substituted “subsections (d) and (e)” for “subsections (f) and (g)” near the end.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added subsection (a.1).

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 527, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any creditable service obtained prior to the effective date of this Act under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and under a local retirement or pension system by any person who is subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-292 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated shall not be rescinded or forfeited as a result of the provisions of said Code Section 47-2-292 as it existed prior to the effective date of this Act [July 1, 1990], and such creditable service is ratified and confirmed.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-292.1.
Tax commissioners, tax collectors, and tax receivers and all employees in their offices employed on or after July 1, 2012, ineligible for membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia by operation of law.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to tax commissioners, tax collectors, and tax receivers and employees in their offices who first or again take office or become employed on or after July 1, 2012.

On and after July 1, 2012, the governing authority of each county shall have the option of including the county tax commissioner, tax collector, or tax receiver and all employees of such person’s office as members of the retirement system. Such option shall be made by adopting a resolution and forwarding such resolution to the board of trustees.

The official in charge of such office, if he or she is responsible for the payment of the employees in that office, or the governing authority of the county, if the official and the employees are paid by it, shall deduct or collect from each member the employee contributions required by this chapter and shall remit the same to the retirement system as required by regulations. The governing authority of the county shall pay to the board of trustees the employer contributions required by this chapter, upon receipt of an invoice from the retirement system.

An election by a county governing authority made pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section may be revoked in the same manner as the election was made, but the county’s obligations as to any officer or employee who became a member of the retirement system as a result of such election shall continue, and the rights and benefits of any such officer or employee shall be unaffected by such revocation.

All persons subject to the provisions of this Code section shall be members of the retirement system under the provisions of Article 10 of this chapter as a condition of holding office.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, no tax commissioner, tax collector, tax receiver, or any employee of any such official shall be eligible for membership in the retirement system if such officer or employee is covered or becomes covered by any other public retirement or pension system, excluding social security coverage.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-292.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1051, § 3/SB 286.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.

47-2-293.
Effect of failure of state court to provide means by which its officials or employees can become members of the retirement system.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any state court which has not provided means by which its employees can become members of the retirement system shall, on and after February 13, 1962, no longer be deemed to be adjuncts of the superior courts. No employee of such state court shall be deemed to be a state employee or otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 54, § 7.

47-2-294.
Limitation on benefits available to persons who transferred to this retirement system or who became members under Code Section 47-2-290 or 47-2-292.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, only voluntary service retirement, death, and disability allowances shall apply to individuals who transferred to this retirement system from another such system or who became members under Code Section 47-2-290 or 47-2-292.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 143, § 5.

47-2-295.
Transfer from county retirement system of contributions made as juvenile detention facility employee; credit for past service; payment of contributions; eligibility.

Any person who becomes a member after January 1, 1980, but before July 1, 1981, as a result of employment with a juvenile detention facility which has been acquired from a county by a state department and who was an employee of such county immediately prior to becoming a member of this retirement system in a position covered under its retirement or pension system shall have the option of transferring to the retirement system the employer and employee contributions credited to him for service as an employee of the juvenile detention facility. This option must be exercised within six months after becoming a member of the retirement system. It shall be exercised by notifying, in writing, the governing body of the county retirement or pension system and the board of trustees of the member’s desire that such contributions be transferred.

Within 30 days after receiving such notification, the governing body of the county retirement or pension system shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system an amount equal to such employer and employee contributions. Upon the receipt of such payment, the board of trustees shall deposit that portion representing employee contributions into the annuity savings fund as a credit to the member; and it shall deposit that portion representing employer contributions into the pension accumulation fund. Upon deposit of such contributions, the member shall receive credit for past service rendered as an employee of the county juvenile detention facility; but the amount of past service credited to such member shall be adjusted as necessary so that the accrued liability to this retirement system created by such past service shall be fully funded by the amount of the payment received by the board of trustees from the county retirement or pension system.

If the payment received by the board of trustees is insufficient to cover all past service rendered as an employee of the county juvenile detention facility on a year-for-year basis, the governing authority of the county which formerly employed such member shall be authorized, but not required, to pay to the board of trustees an amount which, when combined with the payment of employer and employee contributions, shall be sufficient to fund all service rendered as an employee of the juvenile detention facility. In the event a county governing authority elects to pay such additional amount, it shall request, in writing, a certification from the board of trustees of such amount; and, upon such payment, the member shall be given credit for all service rendered as an employee of the county juvenile detention facility. The amount, if any, paid by a county governing authority shall be deposited by the board of trustees into the pension accumulation fund.

In addition to persons who become members of this retirement system pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the provisions of this Code section shall also apply to any persons who become members after July 1, 1986, but before December 31, 1987, as a result of employment with a county juvenile detention facility, the employees of which facility have been acquired from a county by a state department and who were employees of such county immediately prior to becoming members of this retirement system in positions covered under such county’s retirement or pension system.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1544, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1550, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-2-295.1.
Probation and intake officers of Department of Juvenile Justice.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Juvenile Justice.

“Local retirement system” means a retirement or pension system maintained by a county which includes as members thereof county probation and intake officers who become employees of the department as a result of the county probation and intake services being transferred to the department pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 15-11-69. The term includes any such retirement or pension system created by law or created by ordinance or resolution of the county under the home rule provisions of the Constitution.

“Probation and intake officer” means a probation and intake officer as such term is defined in Code Section 15-11-2.

Any probation and intake officer becoming an employee of the department at any time on or after July 1, 1993, as a result of a transfer of county probation and intake services to the department pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 15-11-69 shall have the options and rights provided for by this Code section. The options available to any such employee under this Code section must be exercised within 18 months after the date the applicable county probation and intake services are transferred to the department. Any such option shall be exercised by such employee notifying, in writing, the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the governing authority of the applicable county, and, when applicable, the board of trustees or other managing body of any local retirement system of which the employee is a member. If the employee is a member of a local retirement system, such membership shall continue pending the exercise of an option provided by this Code section. The choice made by an employee in selecting an option provided by this Code section shall be irrevocable and may not at any time thereafter be rescinded or modified.

If an employee subject to this Code section was a member of a local retirement system at the time the applicable county probation and intake services were transferred to the department, such employee may either continue active membership in the local retirement system as provided in this subsection or become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and transfer creditable service as an employee of the local retirement system to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section. An employee electing to continue membership in a local retirement system shall have the right to continue such membership and the salary received by such employee as an employee of the department shall be the salary of such employee for all purposes under the local retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection for the use of certain employer contributions to offset required employee contributions, such employee shall continue to pay the employee contributions required under the local retirement system; and, for such purposes, the department may enter into an agreement with the board of trustees or other managing body of the local retirement system whereby the department may deduct such employee contributions from the compensation of the employee and pay the amount deducted to the local retirement system. Employer contributions for continued membership in the local retirement system shall be computed at the same percentage rate applicable to all other state employees on the basis of the state salary paid to such employees electing to continue membership in the local retirement system and shall be paid by the department when applicable to the local retirement system; provided, however, that, if the employer contributions paid by the department exceed the employer contributions applicable to all other employees of the local retirement system, the difference between the percentage rate of employer contributions paid by the department and the percentage rate of employer contributions applicable to all other employees of the local retirement system shall be applied to offset the percentage rate of employee contributions required of such state employees remaining in the local retirement system; provided, further, that, if the employer contributions to be paid by the department under this subsection would exceed the total employee and employer contributions required under the local retirement system, the department shall only be required to pay the total amount of such employee and employer contributions required under the local retirement system. An employee continuing membership under a local retirement system under this subsection shall retain all rights, benefits, and privileges under the local retirement system in the same manner and to the same extent as if the employee remained an employee of the county; provided, however, that such employee shall not be entitled to health and life insurance benefits available to county employees. An employee electing to continue membership in a local retirement system shall not be and may not become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

An employee who was a member of a local retirement system as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section may elect to become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Any such employee so electing shall receive creditable service under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for all accredited service previously rendered as an employee of the applicable local retirement system. For each employee so electing, the governing authority of the applicable county or the board of trustees or other managing body of the applicable local retirement system, within 30 days after receiving the notice provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, shall pay to the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia the total employee and employer contributions plus interest made by or on behalf of the employee to the local retirement system, together with accumulated interest thereon; provided, however, that the amount so transferred shall not exceed the amount necessary to grant the creditable service under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia authorized by this subsection without creating any unfunded accrued liability, as a result of granting such creditable service, against the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

If an employee subject to this Code section was not a member of a local retirement system at the time the applicable county juvenile detention system became a part of the state-wide juvenile detention system, such employee shall become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia effective on the date the county probation and intake services are transferred to the department. Any such member may purchase as creditable service under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia all or any portion of previous actual service rendered by the member as an employee of the applicable county probation and intake system, except in those instances in which such member has retired or is receiving benefits from a local retirement system. Such creditable service may be purchased by the member’s paying to the board of trustees all employee and employer contributions which would have been made if the employee had been a member of this retirement system, plus regular interest thereon. The time limitation for exercising options provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to the purchase of creditable service under this subsection. Any eligible member may purchase such creditable service at any time during the first five years of membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. No service for which credit is granted pursuant to this subsection shall be used for credit in any local retirement system.

To the extent this Code section conflicts with or is inconsistent with the provisions of a local retirement or pension system affected by this Code section, whether such local retirement or pension system was created by law or by local ordinance, the provisions of this Code section shall control.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-295.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 710, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 20, § 24; Ga. L. 2014, p. 393, § 1/SB 339.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 21, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct this title, in paragraph (a)(2), substituted “officers” for “employees” near the middle, substituted “services” for “services’ ”, substituted “Code Section 15-11-69. The term” for “Code Section 15-11-24.3, and the term” in the middle, and deleted “of Georgia” at the end; substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(3) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Probation and intake employee’ means a probation and intake employee as such term is defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-11-24.3.”; and, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “probation and intake officer” for “person” and substituted “Code Section 15-11-69” for “Code Section 15-11-24.3”.

47-2-295.2.
County juvenile detention
employees who are transferred into department.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Juvenile Justice.

“Local retirement system” means a retirement or pension system maintained by a county which includes as members thereof county juvenile detention employees who become employees of the department as a result of the county juvenile detention services’ being transferred to the department, and the term includes any such retirement or pension system created by law or created by ordinance or resolution of the county under the home rule provisions of the Constitution of Georgia.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, any person who becomes an employee of the department as a result of a transfer of county juvenile detention services to the department shall become a member of this retirement system. Within 30 days of the day any such employee becomes a member of this retirement system, the board of trustees or other managing body of the applicable local retirement system shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system the total employee and employer contributions plus interest made by or on behalf of the employee to the local retirement system, together with accumulated interest thereon, and in addition the governing authority of the county may pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system on behalf of the employee such amount as such county governing authority deems appropriate, and the employee shall receive such creditable service in this retirement system as the total amount will allow without creating any accrued liability against this retirement system; provided, however, that no such person shall receive creditable service in excess of the accredited service previously rendered as an employee of the applicable local retirement system.

An employee subject to this Code section may elect to continue active membership in the local retirement system, and the salary received by such employee as an employee of the department shall be the salary of such employee for all purposes under the local retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, such employee shall continue to pay the employee contributions required under the local retirement system, and the department may enter into an agreement with the board of trustees or other managing body of the local retirement system whereby the department may deduct such employee contributions from the compensation of the employee and pay the amount deducted to the local retirement system. Employer contributions for continued membership in the local retirement system shall be computed at the same percentage rate applicable to all other state employees on the basis of the state salary paid to such employees electing to continue membership in the local retirement system and shall be paid by the department when applicable to the local retirement system; provided, however, that:

If the employer contributions paid by the department exceed the employer contributions applicable to all other employees of the local retirement system, the difference between the percentage rate of employer contributions paid by the department and the percentage rate of employer contributions applicable to all other employees of the local retirement system shall be applied to offset the percentage rate of employee contributions required of such state employees remaining in the local retirement system; and

If the employer contributions to be paid by the department under this subsection would exceed the total employee and employer contributions required under the local retirement system, the department shall only be required to pay the total amount of such employee and employer contributions required under the local retirement system.

An employee continuing membership under a local retirement system under this subsection shall retain all rights, benefits, and privileges under the local retirement system in the same manner and to the same extent as if the employee remained an employee of the county; provided, however, that such employee shall not be entitled to health and life insurance benefits available to county employees. An employee electing to continue membership in a local retirement system shall not be and may not become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

To the extent this Code section conflicts with or is inconsistent with the provisions of a local retirement or pension system affected by this Code section, whether such local retirement or pension system was created by law or by local ordinance, the provisions of this Code section shall control.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-295.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 277, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1.